Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Chapter 14 Wyoming Uniform Consumer Credit Code

Cross references. —

As to consumer protection, see chapter 12 of this title.

As to the applicability of the Wyoming Money Transmitters Act to credit unions, see § 40-22-104(a)(iv).

As to letters of credit, see § 34.1-5-101 et seq.

Comparable U.C.C.C. Sections. —

For comparable sections of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated and the Uniform Consumer Credit Code, see the table below. Please note that subsequent to the enactment of Laws 1971, ch. 191, the Wyoming legislature enacted sections not found in the uniform act. These are codified as Article 2, part 7; Article 3, parts 7 and 8; and Article 6, parts 1A and 3. Also subsequent to the enactment of Laws 1971, ch. 191, the legislature repealed certain provisions found in the uniform act.

W.S. 1997 U.C.C.C.

40-14-101

. . . . .
1-101

40-14-102

. . . . .
1-102

40-14-103

. . . . .
1-103

40-14-104

. . . . .
1-104

40-14-105

. . . . .
1-105

40-14-106

. . . . .
1-107

40-14-107

. . . . .
1-108

40-14-120

. . . . .
1-201

40-14-121

. . . . .
1-202

40-14-140

. . . . .
1-301

40-14-141

. . . . .
1-302

40-14-142

. . . . .
1-303

40-14-201

. . . . .
2-101

40-14-202

. . . . .
2-102

40-14-203

. . . . .
2-103

40-14-204

. . . . .
2-104

40-14-205

. . . . .
2-105

40-14-206

. . . . .
2-106

40-14-207

. . . . .
2-107

40-14-208

. . . . .
2-108

40-14-209

. . . . .
2-109

40-14-210

. . . . .
2-110

40-14-211

. . . . .
2-111

40-14-212

. . . . .
2-201

40-14-213

. . . . .
2-202

40-14-214

. . . . .
2-203

40-14-215

. . . . .
2-204

40-14-216

. . . . .
2-205

40-14-217

. . . . .
2-206

40-14-218

. . . . .
2-207

40-14-219

. . . . .
2-208

40-14-220

. . . . .
2-209

40-14-221

. . . . .
2-210

40-14-222

. . . . .
2-301

40-14-223

. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-224
. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-225

. . . . .
2-304

40-14-226

. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-227
. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-228
. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-229
. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-230
. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-231
. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-232
. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-233
. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-234
. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-235

. . . . .
2-401

40-14-236

. . . . .
2-402

40-14-237

. . . . .
2-403

40-14-238

. . . . .
2-404

40-14-239

. . . . .
2-405

40-14-240

. . . . .
2-406

40-14-241

. . . . .
2-407

40-14-242

. . . . .
2-408

40-14-243

. . . . .
2-409

40-14-244

. . . . .
2-410

40-14-245

. . . . .
2-411

40-14-246

. . . . .
2-412

40-14-247

. . . . .
2-413

40-14-248

. . . . .
2-414

40-14-249

. . . . .
2-415

40-14-250

. . . . .
2-416

40-14-251

. . . . .
2-501

40-14-252

. . . . .
2-502

40-14-253

. . . . .
2-503

40-14-254

. . . . .
2-504

40-14-255

. . . . .
2-505

40-14-256

. . . . .
2-601

40-14-257

. . . . .
2-602

40-14-258

. . . . .
2-603

40-14-259

. . . . .
2-604

40-14-260

. . . . .
2-605

40-14-261

. . . . .
None

40-14-301

. . . . .
3-101

40-14-302

. . . . .
3-102

40-14-303

. . . . .
3-103

40-14-304

. . . . .
3-104

40-14-305

. . . . .
3-105

40-14-306

. . . . .
3-106

40-14-307

. . . . .
3-107

40-14-308

. . . . .
3-108

40-14-309

. . . . .
3-109

40-14-310

. . . . .
3-201

40-14-311

. . . . .
3-202

40-14-312

. . . . .
3-203

40-14-313

. . . . .
3-204

40-14-314

. . . . .
3-205

40-14-315

. . . . .
3-206

40-14-316

. . . . .
3-207

40-14-317

. . . . .
3-208

40-14-318

. . . . .
3-209

40-14-319

. . . . .
3-210

40-14-320

. . . . .
3-301

40-14-321

. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-322
. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-323

. . . . .
3-304

40-14-324

. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-325
. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-326
. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-327
. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-328
. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-329
. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-330
. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-331
. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-332

. . . . .
3-401

40-14-333

. . . . .
3-402

40-14-334

. . . . .
3-403

40-14-335

. . . . .
3-404

40-14-336

. . . . .
3-405

40-14-337

. . . . .
3-406

40-14-338

. . . . .
3-407

40-14-339

. . . . .
3-408

40-14-340

. . . . .
3-409

40-14-341

. . . . .
3-501

40-14-342

. . . . .
3-502

40-14-343

. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-344
. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-345
. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-346
. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-347
. . . . .
[repealed]

40-14-348

. . . . .
3-508

40-14-349

. . . . .
3-509

40-14-350

. . . . .
3-510

40-14-351

. . . . .
3-511

40-14-352

. . . . .
3-512

40-14-353

. . . . .
3-514

40-14-354

. . . . .
3-601

40-14-355

. . . . .
3-602

40-14-356

. . . . .
3-603

40-14-357

. . . . .
3-604

40-14-358

. . . . .
3-605

40-14-359

. . . . .
None

40-14-360

. . . . .
None

40-14-361

. . . . .
None

40-14-362

. . . . .
None

40-14-363

. . . . .
None

40-14-364

. . . . .
None

40-14-401

. . . . .
4-101

40-14-402

. . . . .
4-102

40-14-403

. . . . .
4-103

40-14-404

. . . . .
4-104

40-14-405

. . . . .
4-105

40-14-406

. . . . .
4-106

40-14-407

. . . . .
4-107

40-14-408

. . . . .
4-108

40-14-409

. . . . .
4-109

40-14-410

. . . . .
4-110

40-14-411

. . . . .
4-111

40-14-412

. . . . .
4-112

40-14-430

. . . . .
4-201

40-14-431

. . . . .
4-202

40-14-432

. . . . .
4-203

40-14-450

. . . . .
4-301

40-14-451

. . . . .
4-302

40-14-452

. . . . .
4-303

40-14-453

. . . . .
4-304

40-14-501

. . . . .
5-101

40-14-502

. . . . .
5-102

40-14-503

. . . . .
5-103

40-14-504

. . . . .
5-104

40-14-505

. . . . .
5-105

40-14-506

. . . . .
5-106

40-14-507

. . . . .
5-107

40-14-508

. . . . .
5-108

40-14-520

. . . . .
5-201

40-14-521

. . . . .
5-202

40-14-522

. . . . .
5-203

40-14-523

. . . . .
5-204

40-14-524

. . . . .
5-205

40-14-540

. . . . .
5-301

40-14-541

. . . . .
5-302

40-14-601

. . . . .
6-101

40-14-602

. . . . .
6-102

40-14-603

. . . . .
6-103

40-14-604

. . . . .
6-104

40-14-605

. . . . .
6-105

40-14-606

. . . . .
6-106

40-14-607

. . . . .
6-107

40-14-608

. . . . .
6-108

40-14-609

. . . . .
6-109

40-14-610

. . . . .
6-110

40-14-611

. . . . .
6-111

40-14-612

. . . . .
6-112

40-14-613

. . . . .
6-113

40-14-614

. . . . .
6-114

40-14-615

. . . . .
6-115

40-14-616

. . . . .
None

40-14-630

. . . . .
6-201

40-14-631

. . . . .
6-202

40-14-632

. . . . .
6-203

40-14-633

. . . . .
6-204

40-14-634

. . . . .
None

40-14-635

. . . . .
None

40-14-636

. . . . .
None

40-14-701

. . . . .
9-101

40-14-702

. . . . .
9-102

Editor's notes. —

The division of the Uniform Consumer Credit Code into articles and parts has been retained in this compilation as enacted by Laws 1971, ch. 191. The act, however, did not include any articles 7 and 8. Article 9, therefore, appears as article 7 in this compilation.

Laws 1996, ch. 86, § 5, effective July 1, 1996, provides: “The department of audit shall include within its annual report the fees established and assessed under the Uniform Consumer Credit Code and the department's total costs of regulation under the Code.”

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Uniform Consumer Credit Code,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 663 (1972).

For article, “Lender Liability in Wyoming,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 707 (1991).

For article, “Collecting Debt in Wyoming: The Fair Debt Collection Practices Act as a Trap for the Unwary,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 731 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

17 Am. Jur. 2d Consumer and Borrower Protection §§ 288 to 398.

Modern view as to validity of statute or contractual provision authorizing summary repossession of consumer goods sold under retail installment sales contract, 45 ALR3d 1233.

Consumer class actions based on fraud or misrepresentation, 53 ALR3d 534.

Right to private action under state consumer protection act, 62 ALR3d 169.

Construction and effect of Uniform Consumer Credit Code, 86 ALR3d 317.

Validity and construction of state fair credit reporting acts, 12 ALR4th 294.

Finance company's liability in connection with consumer fraud practices of party selling goods or services, 18 ALR4th 824.

Credit card issuer's liability, under state laws, for wrongful billing, cancellation, dishonor or disclosure, 53 ALR4th 231.

Notification of adverse action on credit application under Equal Credit Opportunity Act (15 U.S.C § 1691 et seq.) and regulations promulgated thereunder (12 CFR Part 202), 65 ALR Fed 906.

Award of attorney's fees under § 130(a) of Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. § 1640(a)), 140 ALR Fed 557.

Construction and application of provision of Fair Debt Collection Practices Act relating to validation of debts (15 U.S.C. § 1692g), 150 ALR Fed 101.

21 C.J.S. Credit Reporting Agencies; Consumer Protection §§ 82 to 89.